Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-402
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Minor Alcoholic Liquor Liability Act are to prevent intoxication-related traumatic injuries, deaths, and other damages and to establish a legal basis for obtaining compensation for persons suffering damages as a result of provision or service of alcoholic liquor to minors under circumstances described in the act.

Laws 2007, LB573, § 2.